Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Chapter 51. Family Preservation Act of 1994

§ 43-51-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Family Preservation Act of 1994.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 607, § 22, eff from and after July 2, 1994.

§ 43-51-3.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings respectively ascribed to them in this section:

“Child at imminent risk of placement” means a minor who may be reasonably expected to face, in the near future, commitment to the care or custody of the state as a result of:

Dependency, abuse or neglect;

Emotional disturbance;

Family conflict so extensive that reasonable control of the child is not exercised; or

Delinquency adjudication.

“Home Ties Program” means a program under the State Department of Human Services of family preservation and family support services.

“Family preservation services” means services designed to help families alleviate risks or crises that might lead to out-of-home placement of children. The services may include procedures to maintain the safety of children in their own homes, support to families preparing to reunify or adopt and assistance to families in obtaining services and other sources of support necessary to address their multiple needs in a culturally sensitive environment.

“Family support services” means preventive community-based activities designed to alleviate stress and to promote parental competencies and behaviors that will increase the ability of families to successfully nurture their children and will enable families to use other resources and opportunities available in the community. These services may include supportive networks designed to enhance child-rearing abilities of parents and to help compensate for the increased social isolation and vulnerability of families. Examples of these services and activities include: respite care for parents and other caregivers; early developmental screening of children to assess the needs of these children and assistance in obtaining specific services to meet their needs; mentoring, tutoring and health education for youth; and a range of center-based activities, such as informal interactions in drop-in centers and parent support groups, and home visiting programs.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 607, § 23, eff from and after July 2, 1994.

§ 43-51-5.
Home Ties Program; planning.

The State Department of Human Services in conjunction with the State Department of Education shall engage in a comprehensive planning process for the Home Ties Program to develop, coordinate and implement a meaningful and responsive program of family support and family preservation services. The scope of planning shall address child welfare, housing, mental health, primary health, education, juvenile justice, community-based programs providing family support and family preservation services and other social programs that service children at imminent risk of placement and their families. In developing the plan, the department, in its discretion, may invite active participation from local consumers, practitioners, researchers, foundations, mayors, members of the Legislature and any available federal regional staff.

The Home Ties Program shall be developed as a pilot program for a period of five (5) years in accordance with federal guidelines promulgated by the United States Department of Health and Human Services. The State Department of Human Services shall oversee development of requests for proposals, contracting for services and program evaluation.

In addition to the family preservation and family support services defined in Section 43-51-3, the Home Ties Program shall offer a wide range of services, included, but not limited to, the following: crisis resolution; teaching measures to prevent the repeated occurrence of abuse, neglect and/or family conflict; education in parenting skills, child development, communication, negotiations and home maintenance skills; child and family advocacy; and job-readiness training.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 607, § 24, eff from and after July 2, 1994.

§ 43-51-7.
Annual application for available federal funds.

The State Department of Human Services shall apply annually for any available federal funds that may be used to defray the planning and service expenses, in all or in part, of the Home Ties Program, including, but not limited to, funds available under the Child and Family Services Program of the Social Security Act.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 607, § 25, eff from and after July 2, 1994.

§ 43-51-9.
Family preservation services evaluations; annual report.

The State Department of Human Services shall conduct ongoing evaluations of family preservation services and shall file a report, on or before December 31 of each year, with the Governor, the Chairmen of the Public Health and Welfare and Judiciary Committees of the Senate and House of Representatives and the Chairman of the Select Committee on Juvenile and School-related Crimes of the House of Representatives. The report shall include the following information for the preceding fiscal year:

A description of the family support and family preservation services included in the comprehensive plan;

The number of families receiving services through the joint program;

The number of children at imminent risk of placement before initiation of service in families receiving services;

Among those children identified in paragraph (b), the number of children placed in foster care, group homes and other facilities outside the home;

The average cost of services provided under the program;

The estimated cost of out-of-home placement, through foster care, group homes or other facilities, which would otherwise have been expended on behalf of those children who successfully remain united with their families as a result of the program, based on average lengths of stay and average costs of out-of-home placements;

The number of children who remain unified with their families for one (1), two (2) and three (3) years, respectively, after receiving services;

An overall statement of the achievements and progress of the program during the preceding year along with recommendations for improvement; and

A description of all applications submitted by the department for federal funding and the amount of any grants made based upon the applications.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 607, § 26, eff from and after July 2, 1994.